Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.250

Legislative—Referendum—Petitions and conduct of elections.

All provisions applicable to the character, form, and number of signatures required for an initiative petition, to the examination and certification thereof, and to the submission to the vote of the people of the ordinance proposed thereby, shall apply to a referendum petition and to the ordinance sought to be defeated thereby.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.250. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 22, part; RRS s 9111, part.]